Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.230

Notice—Failure to respond—Misdemeanor.

It is a misdemeanor for any person who has been personally served with a notice of infraction:

(1) To refuse to sign a written promise to respond to the notice; or

(2) To wilfully violate the written promise to respond to a notice of infraction as provided in this chapter, regardless of the ultimate disposition of the infraction.

[ 1983 c 124 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1983 c 124: See note following RCW 18.106.020.